Hawaii statutes.
§431:8-317 License denial, nonrenewal,
suspension, or revocation. (a) The commissioner may deny, place on
probation, suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew
any surplus lines broker's license and may levy a civil penalty in
accordance with articles 2 and 3, or any combination of these actions, for any
cause specified in any other provision of this chapter, or for any of the
following causes:

(1) Failure to file statements required by section
431:8-313 or to pay the tax required by section 431:8-315;

(2) Failure to keep records or to allow the
commissioner to examine the surplus lines broker's records as provided in this
article;

(3) Removal of office accounts and records from this
State during the period in which the accounts are required to be maintained
under this article;

(4) Any of the causes for which a producer's license
may be suspended or revoked under article 9A;

(5) Any cause for which issuance of the license could
have been refused had it then existed and been known to the commissioner;

(6) Wilful violation or knowing participation in the
violation of any provision of this code;

(7) Obtaining or attempting to obtain a license under
this chapter through wilful misrepresentation or fraud, or failure to pass any
examination required by section 431:8-324;

(8) Misappropriation, conversion to the licensee's
own use, or illegally withholding moneys required to be held in a fiduciary
capacity;

(9) Material misrepresentation with intent to deceive
of the terms or effect of any insurance contract, or engagement or intent to
engage in any fraudulent transaction;

(10) Commission of any unfair practice or fraud as
defined in article 13;

(11) Conduct of affairs under a license issued
pursuant to this chapter in a manner that causes injury and loss to the public;

(12) The issuance or purported issuance of any binder
as to any insurer named in the binder if the licensee is not authorized to bind
the insurer; or

(13) Dealing or attempting to deal with insurance or
exercising powers relative to insurance outside the scope of the licensee's
license.

(b) The license of any business entity may be
denied, placed on probation, suspended, revoked, not issued, or not renewed for
any of the causes applicable to any individual designated in the license to exercise
the business entities' powers.

(c) The holder of any license which has been
revoked or suspended shall surrender the license certificate to the
commissioner at the commissioner's request.

(d) The procedures provided in article 9A for
the suspension or revocation of producer licenses shall apply to suspension or
revocation of a surplus lines broker's license.

(e) No broker whose license has been revoked
shall again be licensed as a broker within one year thereafter, nor until any
fines or delinquent taxes owing by the broker have been paid. [L 1987, c 347,
pt of §2; am L 1989, c 195, §22; am L 2002, c 155, §20; am L 2003, c 212, §50;
am L 2006, c 154, §12; am L 2011, c 68, §15; am L 2012, c 66, §5]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next